Maryland, session 2026, HB0286.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–404.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Approved service provider” means a person who is certified by:
(i) The Administration to service, install, monitor, calibrate, and
provide information on ignition interlock systems; and
(ii) A manufacturer to be qualified to service, install, monitor,
calibrate, and provide information on ignition interlock systems.
(3) “Manufacturer” means a person who manufactures ignition interlock
systems and who certifies that approved service providers are qualified to service, install,
monitor, calibrate, and provide information on ignition interlock systems.
– 1 –

Ch. 80 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Participant” means a participant in the Ignition Interlock System
Program.
(5) “Program” means the Ignition Interlock System Program.
(b) (1) The Administration shall establish an Ignition Interlock System
Program in accordance with this section.
(2) The Administration shall establish a protocol for the Program by
regulations that require certain minimum standards for all service providers who service,
install, monitor, calibrate, and provide information on ignition interlock systems and
include requirements that:
(i) A service provider who applies to the Administration for
certification as an approved service provider shall demonstrate that the service provider is
able to competently service, install, monitor, calibrate, and provide information to the
Administration at least every 30 days on individuals required to use ignition interlock
systems;
(ii) A service provider who applies to the Administration for
certification as an approved service provider shall be certified by a signed affidavit from
the manufacturer that the service provider has been trained by an authorized
manufacturer and that the service provider is competent to service, install, monitor,
calibrate, and provide information on ignition interlock systems;
(iii) Approved service providers be deemed to be authorized
representatives of a manufacturer; and
(iv) Any service of notice upon an approved service provider, who has
violated any laws or regulations or whose ignition interlock system has violated any laws
or regulations, be deemed as service upon the manufacturer who certified the approved
service provider.
(c) An individual may be a participant if:
(1) The individual’s license is suspended or revoked under § 16–205 of this
title for a violation of § 21–902(c) of this article or § 16–404 of this subtitle for an
accumulation of points under § 16–402(a)(29) of this subtitle for driving while impaired by
a drug, a combination of drugs, or a combination of one or more drugs and alcohol;
(2) The individual’s license has an alcohol restriction imposed under §
16–113(g)(1) of this title; or
(3) The Administration modifies a suspension or issues a restricted license
to the individual under § 16–205.1 of this title.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 80
(d) (2) (i) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, an individual
shall be a participant as a condition of modification of a suspension or revocation of a license
or issuance of a restricted license if the individual:
1. Is required to be a participant by a court order under §
21–902.2 of this article; [or]
2. Was under the age of 21 years on the date of a violation by
the individual of[:] § 21–902(C) OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
[A.] 3. [An] VIOLATED AN alcohol restriction imposed
under [§ 16–113(b)(1) of] this title[; or
B. § 21–902(c) of this article].
(ii) If an individual is subject to this paragraph and the individual
fails to participate in the Program or does not successfully complete the Program, the
Administration shall suspend the individual’s license for 1 year.
(iii) Nothing contained in this paragraph limits the authority of the
Administration to modify a suspension imposed under this paragraph to allow an
individual to be a participant in accordance with subsection (e) or (o) of this section.
(iv) The Administration shall issue a restricted license to an
individual who is required to participate in the Program under this section and who is
otherwise eligible.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 3 –